New York, session 2025-2026, S9866.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 16-119 of the administrative code of the city of 2 New York is amended by adding a new subdivision i to read as follows: 3 i. The commissioner shall establish and maintain a registry of all 4 convictions of a violation of this section for a period of three years. 5 Such registry shall be published on the department's public facing 6 website and shall include, but not be limited to: 7 a. the name of the person or entity convicted. 8 b. the nature of the violation of which the person or entity was 9 convicted. 10 c. the penalty imposed. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15433-04-6